Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-612
Unlicensed person; acts not prohibited.

The Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act shall not prohibit the performance of the functions of a certified nurse midwife by an unlicensed person if performed:

(1) In an emergency situation;

(2) By a legally qualified person from another state employed by the United States Government and performing official duties in this state; or

(3) By a person enrolled in an approved program for the preparation of certified nurse midwives as part of such approved program.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 28;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1765;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 27;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 224.